Rhode Island, session 2025, SB132.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-67.1-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-67.1 entitled "Uniform
Act on Prevention of and Remedies for Human Trafficking" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-67.1-20. Display of public-awareness sign — Penalty for failure to display.
(a) Any public or quasi-public transportation agency shall display a public-awareness sign
that contains the state and national human trafficking resource center hotline information in every
transportation station, rest area, and welcome center in the state that is open to the public.
(b) An employer shall display the public-awareness sign described in subsection (a) of this
section in a place that is clearly conspicuous and visible to employees and the public at each of the
following locations in this state at which the employer has employees:
(1) A strip club or other sexually-oriented business;
(2) A business entity previously found to be a nuisance for prostitution;
(3) A job-recruitment center;
(4) A hospital; or
(5) An emergency-care provider.
(c) The department of labor and training shall impose a fine of three hundred dollars ($300)
per violation on an employer that knowingly fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section.
The fine shall be the exclusive remedy for failure to comply.
(d) All monies assessed pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the violent crimes

indemnity account within the general fund, as established pursuant to § 12-25-28, for the purpose
of paying awards granted pursuant to the criminal injuries compensation act established pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 25 of title 12.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000893
========
LC000893 - Page 2 of 3